District of Columbia statutes.
50-921.75

Labor negotiations with streetcar operators and technicians.

If federal funds are used to operate the Streetcar program, the Department shall ensure that employee protective arrangements for employees of the DC Streetcar program comply with 49 U.S.C. § 5333(b) .

May 21, 2002, D.C. Law 14-137, § 11q
as added Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-268, § 3, 60 DCR 1709
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-268 added this section.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268 provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2015.

Section 5 of D.C. Law 19-268, as amended by D.C. Law 21-36, §§ 6162 and 6163, provided that this subchapter shall expire as of September 30, 2016.